District of Columbia statutes.
32-809

Authority to examine place of employment.

The Board, or any officer or employee acting under its authority, shall have the authority, at any reasonable time, to enter any place where an employment covered by this subchapter is being carried on, and to examine any structure, tool, appliance, machinery, or process used in or connected with such employment. No employer or other persons shall refuse to admit any member of the Board or its authorized representative to any such place or to permit any such examination.

History

Sept. 19, 1918, ch. 174, title II, § 9
Oct. 14, 1941, 55 Stat. 738, ch. 438,§ 3

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-229.
1973 Ed., § 36-439.

Editor's Notes

Repeal of chapter: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 32-801.